Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 1. Formation and Management of Mutual Banks.

Sec. 06.15.010.
Declaration of policy.

In providing authority for the establishment of mutual savings banks it is the intent of the legislature to make available the benefits of mutual savings banking, thereby encouraging the practice of thrift and promoting the accumulation of funds for investment to develop the economy. For the accomplishment of these purposes, the legislature intends by this chapter to vest in mutual banks those powers generally possessed by state-chartered mutual savings banks and to grant authority to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to define powers and to adopt regulations designed to enable mutual savings banks to perform their functions and to carry out the above purposes, subject to the provisions of AS 06.05 (Alaska Banking Code) that are not inconsistent with this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 132 SLA 1960; am § 21 ch 218 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development“ was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For prohibited practices and sanctions, see 3 AAC 1, art. 3.

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

For powers of the department, see 3 AAC 6, art. 1.

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 6, art. 2.

For organization and corporate functions of mutual savings banks, see 3 AAC 6, art. 3.

For reorganization, liquidation and dissolution, see 3 AAC 6, art. 4.

For prohibited practices and sanctions, see 3 AAC 6, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d, Banks, §§ 152-153.

Sec. 06.15.020.
Chartering of mutual banks.

Upon written application by five signatories from among not less than 21 individuals acting in the capacity of qualified corporators named in the application, the department may issue a charter for a mutual bank.

History.

(§ 4 a ch 132 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of mutual savings banks, see 3 AAC 6, art. 3.

Sec. 06.15.030.
Issuance of charter.

A charter shall be issued if the department finds that a mutual bank will serve a useful purpose in the community in which it is proposed to be established, that there is reasonable expectation of its financial success, and that its operation will not unduly injure existing banking institutions.

History.

(§ 4 b ch 132 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of mutual savings banks, see 3 AAC 6, art. 3.

Sec. 06.15.040.
Qualification of corporators.

Each corporator shall be an individual, not of unsound mind or capacity, whom the department finds to be of financial responsibility and good character. Without in any way limiting, by enactment of this section, the general regulatory power granted the department by this or any other act, the department may regulate the activities of corporators and prescribe standards of conduct for corporators in their dealings with their mutual bank.

At least a majority of the corporators shall be residents of this state.

History.

(§ 5 a, c ch 132 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 124 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of mutual savings banks, see 3 AAC 6, art. 3.

Sec. 06.15.050.
Corporators.

At their organizational meeting, the corporators shall adopt rules governing their activities as corporators, and may amend the rules from time to time. The rules shall establish the number of corporators and shall prescribe that any number of corporators not less than one-quarter of those at the time in office shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of doing business. At the organizational meeting, or an adjournment thereof, the corporators shall, by majority vote of those present, elect one-third of the total number of corporators to serve for a term of four years, one-third to serve for a term of seven years, and one-third to serve for a term of 10 years. Thereafter each corporator shall be elected for a term of 10 years so that the term of not more than one-third of the corporators will expire in any three-year period. The office of any corporator who becomes of unsound mind and capacity becomes vacant. Successor and additional corporators shall be elected by a majority vote of the corporators present at a duly constituted meeting. A corporator may be removed from office for cause upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the total number of corporators.

History.

(§ 5 d ch 132 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 36 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of mutual savings banks, see 3 AAC 6, art. 3.

For reorganization, liquidation and dissolution, see 3 AAC 6, art. 4.

Sec. 06.15.060.
Trustees.

The corporators shall elect a board of trustees from among their number, consisting of not less than seven nor more than 25, or one-half of all the corporators minus one, whichever is less. A majority of the trustees shall be residents of this state.

History.

(§ 6 a ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.070.
Terms of trustees.

The corporators shall, by a majority vote of those present at their organizational meeting, elect a board of trustees in the following manner: one-third for a term of one year; one-third for a term of two years; and one-third for a term of three years. Thereafter trustees shall be elected to serve for a term of three years. The office of any trustee becomes vacant if the trustee ceases to hold office as a corporator.

History.

(§ 6 a ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.080.
Management and control of mutual bank; bylaws.

The management and control of the affairs of a mutual bank are vested in the board of trustees. The board of trustees may adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws governing the affairs of the mutual bank.

History.

(§ 6 b ch 132 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in the first sentence, substituted “mutual bank are vested” for “mutual bank is vested”.

Sec. 06.15.090.
Failure to attend meetings.

The office of a trustee becomes vacant if the trustee fails to attend regular meetings of the trustees for a period of six months, unless excused during that period by a resolution adopted by the trustees.

History.

(§ 6 c ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.100.
Prohibited conduct of trustees.

A trustee may not

receive remuneration as trustee except reasonable fees for attendance at meetings of trustees or for services as a member of a committee of trustees;

use the position as trustee, or knowingly allow it to be used, to obtain preferential terms in dealings with the mutual bank for which the person is trustee;

use the position as trustee, or knowingly allow it to be used, to induce an actual or prospective borrower from the mutual bank for which the person is trustee to purchase goods or services at a direct or indirect profit to the trustee.

History.

(§ 6 d ch 132 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1965; am § 47 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.15.105.
Trustee borrowing.

A person may borrow money from the mutual bank for which the person is trustee to the same extent that a director may borrow money under AS

06.05.210

.

History.

(§ 48 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.15.110.
Trustee as officer or attorney.

Nothing contained in AS

06.15.100

prohibits or limits any right of a trustee who is also an officer or attorney of the mutual bank from receiving compensation for services as an officer or attorney.

History.

(§ 6 e ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.120.
Exceptions.

Upon application by a mutual bank, an exception may be granted to any prohibition contained in AS

06.15.100

following a determination by the department that the exception sought is equitable, is supported by evidence, and is in the best interests of the depositors of the mutual bank.

History.

(§ 6 f ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.130.
Deposit of funds.

A mutual bank may not deposit any of its funds except with a depositary approved by vote of a majority of all the trustees, exclusive of any trustee who is an officer, partner, director or trustee of the depositary.

History.

(§ 6 g ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.140.
Commencement of operation.

A mutual bank may not begin operation until the department has given its approval to do so. The department may not grant approval to begin operation until the mutual bank has qualified as an insured bank under the Federal Deposit Insurance Act and complied with the provisions of AS 06.05 (Alaska Banking Code) that are not inconsistent with this chapter. A mutual bank that ceases to be qualified under this subsection shall immediately stop operation.

A mutual bank may not commence operation until it has deposited in cash to its credit as an expense fund such sums as the department may require. The deposit shall be evidenced by transferable deferred payment certificates.

History.

(§ 7 ch 132 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of mutual savings banks, see 3 AAC 6, art. 3.